Hawaii statutes.
§587A-28 Return hearing. (a) When a
petition has been filed, the court shall conduct a return hearing within
fifteen days of:

(1) The filing of the petition; or

(2) The date a decision is announced by the court
during a temporary foster custody hearing.

(b) At the return hearing, if it is
established that a party required to be notified has not been served prior to
the hearing, the court shall:

(1) Order the method of service of summons that the
court deems to be appropriate, based upon the available information; and

(2) Set a continued return hearing and:

(A) May waive the appearance of any party at
the continued return hearing; and

(B) If service of summons is ordered to be
made by mail or publication, shall set the continued return hearing no less
than twenty-one days after the date of service as evidenced by the signature of
the recipient on a return receipt or the date of the last publication.

(c) At a continued return hearing, the court
shall:

(1) Enter the default of the party who was served but
failed to appear at the continued return hearing;

(2) Order the party who was served to appear on the
date of the next scheduled hearing in the case; or

(3) Set a hearing on the oral motion to vacate prior
orders, if a party appears at the hearing and moves the court to vacate or
modify prior orders. The moving party shall file a written motion and serve
the other parties with proper written notice of the motion and the hearing
date.

(d) At the return hearing, the court shall
decide:

(1) Whether the child's physical or psychological
health or welfare has been harmed or is subject to threatened harm by the acts
or omissions of the child's family;

(2) Whether the child should be placed in foster
custody or under family supervision; and

(3) What services should be provided to the child's
parents.

(e) If the court finds that the child's
physical or psychological health or welfare has been harmed or is subject to
threatened harm by the acts or omissions of the child's family, the court:

(1) Shall enter a finding that the court has
jurisdiction pursuant to section 587A-5;

(2) Shall enter a finding regarding whether, before
the child was placed in foster care, the department made reasonable efforts to
prevent or eliminate the need to remove the child from the child's family home;

(3) Shall enter orders:

(A) That the child be placed in foster custody
if the court finds that the child's remaining in the family home is contrary to
the welfare of the child and the child's parents are not willing and able to
provide a safe family home for the child, even with the assistance of a service
plan; or

(B) That the child be placed in family
supervision if the court finds that the child's parents are willing and able to
provide the child with a safe family home with the assistance of a service
plan;

(4) Shall determine whether aggravated circumstances
are present.

(A) If aggravated circumstances are present,
the court shall:

(i) Conduct a permanency hearing within thirty
days, and the department shall not be required to provide the child's parents
with an interim service plan or interim visitation; and

(ii) Order the department to file, within sixty
days after the court's finding that aggravated circumstances are present, a
motion to terminate parental rights unless the department has documented in the
safe family home factors or other written report submitted to the court a
compelling reason why it is not in the best interest of the child to file a
motion.

(B) If aggravated circumstances are not
present or there is a compelling reason why it is not in the best interest of
the child to file a motion to terminate parental rights, the court shall order
that the department make reasonable efforts to reunify the child with the
child's parents and order an appropriate service plan;

(5) Shall order reasonable supervised or unsupervised
visits for the child and the child's family, including with the child's
siblings, unless such visits are determined to be unsafe or detrimental to, and
not in the best interests of, the child;

(6) Shall order each of the child's birth parents to
complete the medical information forms and release the medical information
required under section 578-14.5, to the department. If the child's birth
parents refuse to complete the forms or to release the information, the court
may order the release of the information over the parents' objections;

(7) Shall determine whether each party understands
that unless the family is willing and able to provide the child with a safe
family home, even with the assistance of a service plan, within the reasonable
period of time specified in the service plan, their respective parental and
custodial duties and rights shall be subject to termination;

(8) Shall determine the child's date of entry into
foster care as defined in this chapter;

(9) Shall set a periodic review hearing to be
conducted no later than six months after the date of entry into foster care and
a permanency hearing to be held no later than twelve months after the date of
entry into foster care;

(10) Shall set a status conference, as the court deems
appropriate, to be conducted no later than ninety days after the return
hearing; and

(11) May order that:

(A) Any party participate in, complete, be
liable for, and make every good faith effort to arrange payment for such
services or treatment as are authorized by law and that are determined to be in
the child's best interests;

(B) The child be examined by a physician,
surgeon, psychiatrist, or psychologist; and

(C) The child receive treatment, including
hospitalization or placement in other suitable facilities, as is determined to
be in the child's best interests.

(f) If the court finds that the child's
physical or psychological health or welfare has not been harmed or subjected to
threatened harm by the acts or omissions of the child's family, the court shall
enter an order to dismiss the petition and shall state the grounds for
dismissal.

(g) Nothing in this section shall prevent the
court from setting a termination of parental rights hearing at any time the
court deems appropriate. [L 2010, c 135, pt of §1; am L 2011, c 51, §4]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next